Indiana, session 2026, HB1060.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 21-18-9-10.7, AS ADDED BY P.L.213-2025,
SECTION 248, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 10.7. (a) Except as provided in
subsection (c), for each state educational institution degree program,
if the:
(1) average number of students who graduate over the
immediately preceding three (3) years is fewer than:
(A) ten (10) students for a particular associate degree program;
(B) fifteen (15) students for a particular bachelor's degree
program;
(C) seven (7) students for a particular master's degree
program;
(D) three (3) students for a particular education specialist
program; or
(E) three (3) students for a particular doctorate degree
program; and
(2) state educational institution would like to continue a degree
2026 IN 1060—LS 6031/DI 153


program described in subdivision (1);
the state educational institution must request approval from the
commission to continue the degree program.
(b) If the commission does not grant approval under subsection (a),
the state educational institution must eliminate:
(1) the degree program; and
(2) any costs associated with the degree program.
(c) This section does not apply to a state educational institution
degree program primarily focused on emergency medical services
(as defined in IC 16-18-2-110).
2026 IN 1060—LS 6031/DI 153